Utah statutes.
59-1-1419.   Venue -- Section does not affect right to seek judicial review.
(1)  If the commission commences a proceeding relating to the following, the
venue is the Third District Court in Salt Lake City:
(a)  failure to pay a liability;
(b)  failure to file a return; or
(c)  failure to supply information.
(2)  Nothing in this section affects a right to seek judicial review in
accordance with Part 6, Judicial Review.
